Tennessee, session 114, SB1579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 50, Chapter 6, Part 9, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) This section is known and may be cited as the "Zero Estimated Exposure
Policy Act."
(b) As used in this section, "zero estimated exposure policy" means a policy of
insurance that a construction services provider obtains to cover the construction services
provider's liability to pay compensation under this chapter after reporting the total
estimated exposure is zero (0).
(c)
(1) If a construction services provider obtains a zero estimated exposure
policy, the construction services provider must provide written notification to all
entities it directly contracts with to provide or perform building construction or
improvement services of the construction services provider's total estimated
exposure of zero (0) and provide a copy of the policy.
(2) When an entity receives the notification required by subdivision (c)(1),
the entity must maintain the written notification and policy provided for three (3)
years from the date the notification and policy were received.
(3) A homeowner contracting for the construction of a single-family
residence or improvements to the homeowner's primary residence is not required
to retain the written notification required by subdivision (c)(1).
SB1579
010413
- 1 -

(d) Each insurer shall require with or as part of each completed application for a
zero estimated exposure policy a statement signed by the applicant attesting to the
accuracy of the information on the application, including the applicant's absence of
employees and estimated exposure of zero (0). The attestation must include the
following statement:
I attest that all information provided on this application is current, true, correct,
accurate, and complete to the best of my knowledge and belief. I further attest
that I have no employees and an estimated exposure of zero (0). If during the
policy period I employ any employees or otherwise have an exposure greater
than zero (0), I must provide within sixty (60) days of such change written
notification to my workers' compensation insurer that includes estimated payroll
and classification codes. I understand that omissions or misrepresentations with
intent to defraud on this application are a crime under Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 56-47-103 and a violation of Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 56-47-104.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-6-421(b), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(4) For construction services providers as defined in § 50-6-901, the construction
services provider's total estimated exposure amount for a zero estimated exposure
policy and the construction services provider's reported classification codes for a zero
estimated exposure policy.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2027, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010413